Utah statutes.
65A-8-305.   Powers of division.

The division may:

(1)  grant or deny applications for designation of heritage trees from individuals, local shade tree commissions, or local governments;

(2)  grant or deny applications for alteration or removal of heritage trees;

(3)  acquire land if one or more heritage trees are located on the land;

(4)  accept gifts, bequests, or donations; and

(5)  determine policies necessary to carry out this part.

